Mississippi, session 2026, HB464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  As used in Sections 1 through 4 of this act, the following terms shall have the meanings as defined in this section, unless the context otherwise requires: (a) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Labor. (b) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Labor. (c) "Director" means the administrative head of an office. (d)  "Office" means an administrative subdivision of the department. SECTION 2. (1)  There is created the Mississippi Department of Labor for the following purposes: (a)  To coordinate employer-employee services and relations; (b)  To establish and oversee an effective and efficient workforce development system in Mississippi to enable residents to acquire the skills necessary to maximize their economic self-sufficiency; and (c)  To provide Mississippi employers with the work force they need to effectively compete in the changing world economy. (2)  The department shall be composed of the following offices: (a)  The Office of Employment Security; (b)  The Office of Job Development and Training; (c)  The Office of Industry Service and Industry Start-up Training; (d)  The Office of Employee Relations and Job Discrimination; and (e)  The Office of Disabled Employee Assistance. SECTION 3. The Mississippi Department of Labor shall provide the labor-management services authorized by law and by the rules, regulations and policies of the department to every individual determined to be eligible, and in carrying out the purposes of Sections 1 through 4 of this act, the department is authorized to: (a)  Expend funds received either by appropriation or directly from federal or private sources; (b)  Cooperate with other departments, agencies and institutions, both public and private, in providing the services authorized by Sections 1 through 4 of this act to individuals, in studying the problems involved therein, and in establishing, developing and providing in conformity with the purposes of Sections 1 through 4 of this act any programs, facilities and services as may be necessary or desirable; (c)  Enter into reciprocal agreements with other states to provide for the services authorized by Sections 1 through 4 of this act to residents of the states concerned; (d)  Conduct research and compile statistics relating to the provision of services to or the need of services by individuals; (e)  Enter into contractual arrangements with the federal government and with other authorized public agencies or persons for performance of services related to labor-management; and (f)  Take any action as may be necessary to enable the department to apply for, accept and receive for the state and its residents the full benefits available under any federal legislation or program having as its purpose the providing of, improvement of or extension of labor-management services. SECTION 4. (1)  The Chief Officer of the Mississippi Department of Labor shall be the Commissioner of Labor, who shall be elected at the general election in 2027 and every four (4) years thereafter in the same manner as the public officers provided in Section 23-15-193, and Section 140 of the Constitution.  However, the Governor shall appoint a qualified person to serve as the Commissioner of Labor from July 1, 2026, until the general election in 2027.  From and after the general election in 2027, the Commissioner of Labor's term of office shall be for four (4) years.  The commissioner shall receive a compensation as provided in Section 25-3-31.  The commissioner shall be responsible for the proper administration of the programs of labor-management relations provided under Sections 1 through 4 of this act and shall be responsible for appointing directors of offices and any necessary supervisors, assistants and employees. The salary and compensation of those employees shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Personnel Board. (2)  In carrying out the duties under Sections 1 through 4 of this act, the Commissioner of Labor shall: (a)  Promulgate regulations governing personnel standards, the protection of records and confidential information, the manner and form of filing applications, eligibility and investigation and determination therefor, for labor-management services, procedures for fair hearings and any other regulations as he or she finds necessary to carry out the purposes of Sections 1 through 4 of this act and in conformity with federal and state law; (b)  Establish appropriate subordinate administrative units within the department; (c)  Prepare and submit to the Legislature annual reports of activities and expenditures and, before each regular session of the Legislature, coordinate budget requests required for carrying out Sections 1 through 4 of this act and estimates of the amounts to be made available for this purpose from all sources; (d)  Be empowered to exercise executive and administrative supervision over all institutions, offices, programs and services existing as of July 1, 2026, or acquired or created on or after July 1, 2026, under the jurisdiction of the department; (e)  Make certification for disbursement, in accordance with regulations, of funds available for implementing the purposes of Sections 1 through 4 of this act; (f)  Take such other action as he or she deems necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of Sections 1 through 4 of this act; and (g)  Be empowered to delegate to any officer or employee of the department such of his or her powers and duties as he or she finds necessary to effectuate the purposes of Sections 1 through 4 of this act. Any reference in this chapter or in any other provision of law to the "Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security" means the Commissioner of Labor created in Section 4 of this act. SECTION 5.  Section 71-5-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 71-5-101.  * * *There is established the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor.  The Department of Employment Security shall be the Mississippi Employment Security Commission and shall retain all powers and duties as granted to the Mississippi Employment Security Commission.  Wherever the term "Employment Security Commission" appears in any law, the same shall mean the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor.  The Executive Director of the Department of Employment Security may assign to the appropriate offices such powers and duties deemed appropriate to carry out the lawful functions of the department On July 1, 2026, the Mississippi Department of Employment Security is abolished, and the duties and powers of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security and all equipment, supplies, records and funds appropriated by the Legislature to the Mississippi Department of Employment Security shall be transferred to the Office of Employment Security in the Mississippi Department of Labor created in Section 2 of this act.  Any reference in this chapter or in any other provision of law to "Mississippi Department of Employment Security" or "Mississippi Employment Security Commission" means the Office of Employment Security within the Mississippi Department of Labor created in Section 2 of this act. SECTION 6.  Section 71-5-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, which provides for the appointment of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, is repealed. SECTION 7. The Office of Job Development and Training of the Mississippi Department of Labor shall administer and coordinate as necessary the following federal and state-funded employment, training and employment-related education programs: (a) training and employment-related education programs sponsored by the federal Job Training Partnership Act; (b) employment programs under the Wagner-Peyser Act; (c) employment, training and education programs for welfare recipients funded by the federal JOBS and Basic Skills Training Program within the Family Support Act; and (d) the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act of 1973. SECTION 8. The Office of Industry Service and Industry Start-up Training in the Mississippi Department of Labor shall contract with the Mississippi Community College Board and the Office of Career and Technical Education and Workforce Development to provide (a) all programs embracing an existing industry or a new industrial training component, and (b) all employment-related community/junior college or employment-related secondary education programs. SECTION 9. The Office of Employee Relations and Job Discrimination in the Mississippi Department of Labor shall do all in its power to promote the voluntary arbitration, mediation and conciliation of disputes between employers and employees and to avoid strikes, picketing, lockouts, boycotts, blacklisting, discriminations and legal proceedings in matters of employment.  In pursuance of this duty, the office may appoint temporary boards of arbitration, provide necessary expenses of those boards, order reasonable compensation for each member engaged in that arbitration, prescribe rules for those arbitration boards, conduct investigations and hearings, publish reports and advertisements, and may do all things convenient and necessary to accomplish those purposes.  The office may designate a mediator and may detail employees or persons not in the office from time to time for the purpose of executing these provisions.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to in any way prohibit or limit employees' right to bargain collectively. SECTION 10. The Office of Disabled Employee Assistance of the Mississippi Department of Labor shall function as an information clearinghouse and referral service for employees and employers regarding any aspect of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, which prohibits discrimination in all terms and conditions of employment regarding private and public employers. SECTION 11.  Section 7-1-351, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-1-351.  The * * *Department of Economic and Community Development Office of Job Development and Training of the Mississippi Department of Labor shall be the Division of Job Development and Training and shall retain all powers and duties granted by law to the Division of Job Development and Training and wherever the term "Division of Job Development and Training" shall appear in any law it shall mean the Mississippi Department of * * *Economic and Community Development Labor.  * * *  The executive director may assign to appropriate divisions powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the lawful functions of the department. SECTION 12.  Section 7-1-355, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-1-355.  (1)  The * * * Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, Office of Job Development and Training of the Mississippi Department of Labor is designated as the sole administrator of all programs for which the state is the prime sponsor under Title 1(B) of Public Law 105-220, Workforce Investment Act of 1998, and the regulations promulgated * * * thereunder under that act, and may take all necessary action to secure to this state the benefits of that legislation.  The * * * Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, Office of Job Development and Training of the Mississippi Department of Labor may receive and disburse funds for those programs that become available to it from any source. (2)  The * * * Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, Office of Job Development and Training of the Mississippi Department of Labor shall establish guidelines on the amount and/or percentage of indirect and/or administrative expenses by the local fiscal agent or the Workforce Development Center operator.  The * * * Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, Office of Job Development and Training of the Mississippi Department of Labor shall develop an accountability system and make an annual report to the Legislature before December 31 of each year on Workforce Investment Act activities.  The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following: (a)  The total number of individuals served through the Workforce Development Centers and the percentage and number of individuals for which a quarterly follow-up is provided; (b)  The number of individuals who receive core services by each center; (c)  The number of individuals who receive intensive services by each center; (d)  The number of Workforce Investment Act vouchers issued by the Workforce Development Centers including: (i)  A list of schools and colleges to which these vouchers were issued and the average cost per school of the vouchers; and (ii)  A list of the types of programs for which these vouchers were issued; (e)  The number of individuals placed in a job through Workforce Development Centers; and (f)  The monies and the amount retained for administrative and other costs received from Workforce Investment Act funds for each agency or organization that Workforce Investment Act funds flow through as a percentage and actual dollar amount of all Workforce Investment Act funds received. SECTION 13.  Section 7-1-357, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-1-357.  The * * *Division Office of Job Development and Training * * *, Office of the Governor, of the Mississippi Department of Labor is * * * hereby authorized to cooperate with or enter into agreements with any agency, official, educational institution or political subdivision of this state, any agency or official of the government of the United States of America, or any private person, firm, partnership or corporation in order to carry out the provisions of Sections 7-1-351 through 7-1-371. SECTION 14.  Section 7-1-361, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-1-361.  The * * *Division Office of Job Development and Training * * *, Office of the Governor, of the Mississippi Department of Labor is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 7-1-351 through 7-1-371. SECTION 15.  Section 7-1-363, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-1-363.  To the maximum extent practicable, the Department of * * *Economic and Community Development Labor shall contract with the * * *Division of Vocational‑Technical Education Office of Career and Technical Education and Workforce Development of the * * *State Mississippi Department of Education to provide all programs embracing an institutional training component.  * * *Such Those programs shall be contracted to the * * *Division of Vocational‑Technical Education of the State Department of Education Office of Career and Technical Education and Workforce Development of the Mississippi Department of Education, except those programs funded by the Governor's special grant, shall be coordinated with and complementary to the existing state public educational systems and shall not be duplicative or competitive in nature to * * *such those systems. SECTION 16.  Section 7-1-365, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-1-365.  The * * *State Mississippi Department of Education,   * * *Vocational‑Technical Division, Office of Career and Technical Education and Workforce Development, the board of trustees of any junior college district, the board of trustees of any school district, the Mississippi * * *Employment Security Commission Department of Employment Security Department of Labor, and the * * *Division Office of Job Development and Training, * * *Office of the Governor Mississippi Department of Labor, shall cooperate in carrying out the provisions of Sections 7-1-351 through 7-1-371. SECTION 17.  Section 25-3-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-3-31.  (1)  The annual salaries of the following elected state and district officers are fixed as follows: Governor........................................... $ 160,000.00 Attorney General..................................... 150,000.00 Secretary of State................................... 120,000.00 Commissioner of Insurance............................ 150,000.00 State Treasurer...................................... 120,000.00 State Auditor of Public Accounts..................... 150,000.00 Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce.............. 120,000.00 Commissioner of Labor................................. 120,000.00 Transportation Commissioners......................... 95,000.00 Public Service Commissioners......................... 95,000.00 (2)  [Repealed] SECTION 18.  Section 23-15-193, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-193.  (1)  (a) At the election in 2023, * * * and every four (4) years thereafter, there shall be elected a Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, Attorney General, three (3) public service commissioners, three (3) Mississippi Transportation Commissioners, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, Senators and members of the House of Representatives in the Legislature, district attorneys for the several districts, clerks of the circuit and chancery courts of the several counties, as well as sheriffs, coroners, assessors, surveyors and members of the boards of supervisors, justice court judges and constables, and all other officers to be elected by the people at the general state election.  All such officers shall hold their offices for a term of four (4) years, and until their successors are elected and qualified.  The state officers shall be elected in the manner prescribed in Section 140 of the Constitution. (b)  At the election in 2027, and every four (4) years thereafter, there shall be elected a Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, Attorney General, three (3) public service commissioners, three (3) Mississippi Transportation Commissioners, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, Commissioner of Labor, Senators and members of the House of Representatives in the Legislature, district attorneys for the several districts, clerks of the circuit and chancery courts of the several counties, as well as sheriffs, coroners, assessors, surveyors and members of the boards of supervisors, justice court judges and constables, and all other officers to be elected by the people at the general state election. All such officers shall hold their offices for a term of four (4) years, and until their successors are elected and qualified.  The state officers shall be elected in the manner prescribed in Section 140 of the Constitution. (2)  The candidate that receives a majority of votes cast for the office at the general election shall be elected.  If no candidate receives a majority number of votes cast at the election, then the two (2) candidates who receive the highest number of votes cast shall have their names placed on the ballot for the runoff election to be held four (4) weeks later.  The candidate who receives a majority of the votes cast in the runoff election shall be elected.  However, if no candidate receives a majority vote cast at the election, and there is a tie in the election of those receiving the next highest vote, then those candidates receiving the next highest vote and the candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast shall have their names placed on the ballot for the runoff election to be held four (4) weeks later, and whoever receives the majority of votes cast in the runoff election shall be elected.  If it appears that two (2) or more candidates for office have an equal number of votes after the runoff election, the interested candidates shall appear before the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court within two (2) days after the canvass and the tie shall be determined by a toss of a coin or by lot fairly and publicly drawn, and a certificate of election shall be given accordingly. (3)  The provisions of Section 23-15-981 shall control the runoff elections of justice court judges. SECTION 19.  Section 23-15-297, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-297.  (1)  All candidates, upon entering the race for party nominations for office, shall first pay to the proper officer as provided for in Section 23-15-299 for each primary election the following amounts: (a)  Candidates for Governor, the amount determined by the state executive committee of the party pursuant to subsection (2) of this section but no less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and no more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (b)  Candidates for Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, Commissioner of Labor, State Highway Commissioner and State Public Service Commissioner, the amount determined by the state executive committee of the party pursuant to subsection (2) of this section but no less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and no more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00). (c)  Candidates for State Senator and State Representative, Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00). (d)  Candidates for district attorney, Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00). (e)  Candidates for sheriff, chancery clerk, circuit clerk, tax assessor, tax collector, county attorney, county superintendent of education and board of supervisors, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (f)  Candidates for county surveyor, county coroner and constable, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (g)  Candidates for United States Senator, the amount determined by the state executive committee of the party pursuant to subsection (2) of this section but no less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and no more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (h)  Candidates for United States Representative, the amount determined by the state executive committee of the party pursuant to subsection (2) of this section but no less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and no more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00). (2)  (a)  The state executive committee of a political party shall set the entry fee that a candidate is to pay upon entering the race for party nominations for the offices listed in paragraphs (a), (b), (g) and (h) of subsection (1) of this section and Section 23-15-1093(2)(a).  The authority granted under this subsection shall not be exercised by any state executive committee of a political party for any individual office more than once every two (2) years, beginning July 1, 2022. (b)  Each state executive committee of a political party shall report the entry fee determined for each office to the Secretary of State by October 1 of the year before the election is held for that office.  If a state executive committee does not meet the deadline in this paragraph for any office, the minimum entry fee shall be assessed for the office in that party's primary election during that election cycle. (3)  All independent candidates and special election candidates entering the race for office shall pay to the proper officer as provided for in Section 23-15-299 the following amounts: (a)  Candidates for Governor, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (b)  Candidates for Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, Commissioner of Labor, State Highway Commissioner and State Public Service Commissioner, Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (c)  Candidates for district attorney, State Senator and State Representative, Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00). (d)  Candidates for sheriff, chancery clerk, circuit clerk, tax assessor, tax collector, county attorney, county superintendent of education and board of supervisors, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (e)  Candidates for county surveyor, county coroner and constable, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (f)  Candidates for United States Senator, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (g)  Candidates for United States Representative, Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (4)  The Secretary of State shall publish the fees listed in this section and Section 23-15-1093 no later than forty-five (45) days before the qualifying period begins for each office. SECTION 20.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.